Hawaii statutes.
§149A-23 Cooperation. The department
may cooperate or enter into agreements with any other agency of the State or
any agency of the federal government for the purpose of carrying out this
chapter and securing uniformity of rules. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am L 1975, c
126, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 310, §14]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next